Washington statutes.
RCW 15.115.020

Regulations and restraints applicable to the wheat and barley industries.

The wheat and barley industries are highly regulated industries, and this chapter and the rules adopted under it are only one aspect of the regulation of those industries. Other regulations and restraints applicable to the wheat and barley industries include:

(1) Chapter 15.04 RCW, Washington agriculture general provisions;

(2) Chapter 15.08 RCW, horticultural pests and diseases;

(3) Chapter 15.14 RCW, planting stock;

(4) Chapter 15.49 RCW, seeds;

(5) Chapter 15.54 RCW, fertilizers, minerals, and limes;

(6) Chapter 15.58 RCW, Washington pesticide control act;

(7) Chapter 15.64 RCW, farm marketing;

(8) Chapter 15.83 RCW, agricultural marketing and fair practices;

(9) Chapter 15.86 RCW, organic products;

(10) Chapter 15.92 RCW, center for sustaining agriculture and natural resources;

(11) Chapter 17.24 RCW, insect pests and plant diseases;

(12) Chapter 19.94 RCW, weights and measures;

(13) Chapter 20.01 RCW, agricultural products—commission merchants, dealers, brokers, buyers, agents;

(14) Chapter 22.09 RCW, agricultural commodities;

(15) Chapter 43.23 RCW, department of agriculture;

(16) Chapter 69.04 RCW, food, drugs, cosmetics, and poisons including provisions of Title 21 U.S.C. relating to the general manufacturing practices, food labeling, food standards, food additives, and pesticide tolerances;

(17) Chapter 70A.15 RCW, Washington clean air act, agricultural burning;

(18) 7 U.S.C., Sec. 136, federal insecticide, fungicide, and rodenticide act; and

(19) 7 U.S.C., Sec. 1621, agricultural marketing act.

[ 2021 c 65 s 13; 2011 c 103 s 33; 2009 c 33 s 2.]

NOTES:

Explanatory statement—2021 c 65: See note following RCW 53.54.030.

Purpose—2011 c 103: See note following RCW 15.26.120.